Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 17 Witnesses

9-17-1.
Form of subpoena.

The form of subpoena to a witness shall be substantially as follows:

Sc. To of Greeting: You are hereby required, in the name of the state of Rhode Island, to make your appearance before holden at on the day of to give evidence of what you know relative to an action or plea of then and there are to be heard and tried between plaintiff and defendant. Hereof fail not, as you will answer your default under the penalty of the law in that behalf made and provided. Dated at the day of in the year .

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 357; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-1

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 7, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 7, effective June 23, 2021.

9-17-2.
Subpoenas by court clerks and district court judges.

Clerks of court and judges of the district court may issue subpoenas to witnesses in all cases pending in their own or any other court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 358; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 11.

9-17-3.
Subpoenas issued by other officials.

Auditors, referees, masters in chancery, and commissioners may issue subpoenas to witnesses in all cases and matters pending before them, respectively; and justices of the peace and notaries public may issue subpoenas to witnesses in any case, civil or criminal, before any court, and in any matter before any body or person authorized by law to summon witnesses.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 359; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-3

.

9-17-4.
Service of subpoena.

A subpoena to a witness shall be served by delivering a copy to him or her.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 361; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 31.

9-17-5.
Duty to attend when subpoenaed.

Every witness who shall be duly served with a subpoena in behalf of any party to a suit or proceeding, civil or criminal, and shall have his or her lawful fees tendered to him or her for his or her travel from his or her place of abode to the place at which he or she shall be summoned to attend, and for one day’s attendance, shall be obliged to attend accordingly.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 362; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-5

.

9-17-5.1.
Subpoena for production of documentary evidence.

When a subpoena for the production of books, papers, documents, or tangible things is served on a federal or state agency, public utility, national bank, insurance company, financial institution, or a public or private institution of higher education organized under state or federal laws, it shall be deemed a sufficient response to the subpoena if the employee of the entity charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the original records promptly provides the attorney for the party causing service of the subpoena copies of all documents requested by the subpoena. All responses to the subpoena shall contain a certificate which shall be signed before a notary public by the employee of the entity charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the records and shall include a legend substantially to the following effect: “The copies of records for which this certification is made are true and complete reproductions of the original or microfilmed records which are in the possession of (name of entity). The original records were made in the regular course of business, and it was the regular course of (name of entity) to make such records at or near the time of the matter recorded. This certification is given pursuant to Rhode Island general laws §

9-17-5.1

by the custodian of the records in lieu of his or her personal appearance.”

Documents or records of any federal or state agency, public utility, national bank, financial institution organized under state or federal laws, a public or private institution of higher education, or of a hospital that are susceptible to photostatic reproduction may be proved as to foundation, identity, and authenticity without any preliminary testimony, by use of legible and durable copies, certified in the manner provided in subsection (a) by the employee of the entity charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the originals thereof. The copies may be used in any trial, hearing, deposition, or any other judicial or administrative action or proceeding, whether civil or criminal, in lieu of the original documents or records which, however, the entity shall hold available for inspection and comparison by the court, tribunal, or hearing officer and by the parties and their attorneys of record.

In the event any of the entities are unable to provide the documents requested in the subpoena due to the timeliness of the service of the subpoena or for other legal reasons, then the employee charged with the responsibility of being custodian of the records for the entity shall set forth in the certificate required hereunder the specific reasons for the noncompliance, the time of service of the subpoena, and if appropriate the time anticipated in complying with the subpoena.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 188, § 22.

9-17-6.
Tender of fees to certain witnesses not required.

A witness summoned in behalf of the state or, in a criminal proceeding, in behalf of a defendant who the court finds is financially unable to pay witness fees shall have no right to have his or her fees paid or tendered to him or her before he or she shall be bound to obey the summons.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 363; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-6

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 6.

9-17-7.
Attachment to compel attendance.

The court before which any witness is duly summoned to appear may compel his or her attendance by writ of attachment, fine him or her not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00), and order him or her to pay the costs of the attachment and to be committed to the adult correctional institutions until the fine and costs are paid.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 365; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-7

; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1.

9-17-8.
Attachment of witness in criminal proceeding.

Whenever any witness, duly served with a subpoena to testify in any criminal proceeding at any court, shall neglect to appear according to the tenor of the subpoena, the court may order a writ of attachment to issue against him or her, returnable at such time as the court shall direct, and may direct the writ of attachment to each and all deputy sheriffs, town sergeants, and constables within the state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 366; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-8

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 18.

9-17-9.
Commitment of attached witness — Recognizance.

If the court from which the writ of attachment issues, pursuant to §

9-17-8

, shall not be in session at the time of the service of the writ, the officer charged with the service thereof shall commit the witness to jail, either in the county from which the writ shall issue or in which the witness shall be, there to be kept until he or she shall give recognizance before some person authorized to take bail in the same county, with sufficient surety, in the sum of one hundred dollars ($100), to appear before the court on the day named in the writ, or, failing to give recognizance, until he or she is discharged by the court; and the recognizance shall be returned by the person to the clerk of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 367; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-9

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 82.

9-17-10.
Discharge from custody on giving of recognizance.

The witness may give recognizance as provided in §

9-17-9

while in custody of the officer, before he or she is committed to jail; and thereupon the officer shall discharge him or her from custody.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 368; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-10

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 82.

9-17-11.
Civil liability for failure to attend.

Every witness who does not appear according to the tenor of the subpoena, and has no reasonable excuse for his or her nonappearance, shall be liable to an action by the aggrieved party for all damages sustained in consequence of the default.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 364; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-11

.

9-17-12.
Competency of parties or interested persons.

No person shall be disqualified from testifying in any civil action or proceeding by reason of his or her being interested therein or being a party thereto.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 389; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-12

.

9-17-13.
Spouses of parties.

In the trial of every civil cause, the husband or wife of either party shall be deemed a competent witness; provided, that neither shall be permitted to give any testimony tending to criminate the other or to disclose any communication made to him or her, by the other, during their marriage, except on trials of petitions for divorce between them, trials between them involving their respective property rights, and under the provisions of §

11-34.1-9

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 391; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-13

; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 16.

9-17-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 58; P.L. 1939, ch. 705, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 4. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-17-15.
Effect of conviction for crime.

No person shall be deemed an incompetent witness because of his or her conviction of any crime, or sentence to imprisonment therefor; but shall be admitted to testify like any other witness, except that conviction or sentence for any crime or misdemeanor may be shown to affect his or her credibility.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 395; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-15

.

9-17-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 390; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-16

; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 4. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-17-17.
Cross-examination not a waiver of exception.

Where the testimony of a witness upon any subject, at any trial or hearing, is admitted by the court, and exception thereto is taken, the cross-examination of the witness upon the subject, by the party excepting thereto, shall not be considered a waiver of the exception.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 4053/4; P.L. 1909, ch. 418, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-17

.

9-17-18.
Certificate of days and mileage as prerequisite to payment of fees.

Every witness, previous to his or her obtaining any fee, except the amount which, in certain cases, must be tendered to him or her before he or she can be compelled to attend, shall give a certificate to the court wherein he or she has attended, certifying the number of days he or she has attended and the number of miles he or she has traveled; which certificate shall be subject to the examination of the court, and, if question arises, such allowance shall be made thereon as shall be lawfully due.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 369; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-18

.

9-17-19 — 9-17-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 370-372; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, §§ 18-20; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, §§ 18-20; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, §§ 20-22; G.L. 1956, §§

9-17-19

— 9-17-21; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 31; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 6; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 6; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 4. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

9-17-22.
Expert fees as costs.

Fees of experts, except as provided in the Rules of Evidence, shall not be allowed as part of the costs in any case in excess of the fees allowed for ordinary witnesses.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 373; G.L. 1909, ch. 292, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 342, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 537, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

9-17-22

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 82.

9-17-23.
Privileged communications to clergy.

In the trial of every cause, both civil and criminal, no member of the clergy or priest shall be competent to testify concerning any confession made to him or her in his or her professional character in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she belongs, without the consent of the person making the confession. No duly ordained minister of the gospel, priest, or rabbi of any denomination shall be allowed in giving testimony to disclose any confidential communication, properly entrusted to him or her in his or her professional capacity, and necessary and proper to enable him or her to discharge the functions of his or her office in the usual course of practice or discipline, without the consent of the person making the communication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 109, § 1.

9-17-24.
Privileged communications to and information obtained by health care providers.

In every legal action, both civil and criminal, no health care provider shall be competent to testify concerning any information obtained about a patient, nor shall he or she be required to produce any documentary evidence obtained about a patient, in the course of the customary professional health care relationship, without the consent of the patient, his or her legal guardian, or, if the patient is deceased, his or her next-of-kin, executor, or administrator. No health care provider shall be allowed in giving testimony to disclose any confidential communication or health care information, properly entrusted to him or her in his or her professional capacity and within the customary health care relationship, and necessary and proper to enable him or her to discharge medical duties in the usual course of practice, without the consent of the patient, his or her legal guardian, or, if the patient is deceased, his or her next-of-kin, executor, or administrator. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a health care provider may be required to testify or produce documentary evidence regarding the medical condition of a patient:

When a patient raises his or her own medical condition in a legal action;

When a court determines that disclosure of health care information about a person is necessary to a determination of the perceptual capacity of that person as a witness in a legal proceeding and that information is unavailable from any source other than a health care provider;

When a court orders or the parties to a legal action agree to a medical evaluation of a party or witness by a health care provider in order to facilitate the resolution of the legal action;

When the question of the competence of a decedent is at issue before the court; or

When consent is not required pursuant to chapter 37.3 of title 5; provided, however, that any such information shall not be admissible in any proceeding against the patient to whom the information pertains.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 503, § 1.

9-17-25.
Privileged communication — Interpreter.

Whenever a sign language interpreter is used to facilitate a communication which is privileged pursuant to either statutory law or common law between parties, one or more of whom is hearing impaired, the sign language interpreter shall not be compelled to testify in any forum regarding that communication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 281, § 1.